Washington statutes.
RCW 4.84.040

Limitation on costs in certain actions.

In an action for an assault and battery, or for false imprisonment, libel, slander, malicious prosecution, criminal conversation or seduction, if the plaintiff recover less than ten dollars, he or she shall be entitled to no more costs or disbursements than the damage recovered.

[ 2011 c 336 s 120; Code 1881 s 508; 1877 p 108 s 512; 1869 p 123 s 460; 1854 p 202 s 370; RRS s 477.]